Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.838

Record checks—Transcript of conviction record—Fees—Immunity—Rules.

(1) After January 1, 1988, and notwithstanding any provision of RCW 43.43.700 through 43.43.810 to the contrary, the state patrol shall furnish a transcript of the conviction record pertaining to any person for whom the state patrol or the federal bureau of investigation has a record upon the written request of:

(a) The subject of the inquiry;

(b) Any business or organization for the purpose of conducting evaluations under RCW 43.43.832;

(c) The department of social and health services;

(d) Any law enforcement agency, prosecuting authority, or the office of the attorney general;

(e) The department of social and health services for the purpose of meeting responsibilities set forth in chapter 18.51, 18.20, or 72.23 RCW, or any later-enacted statute which purpose is to regulate or license a facility which handles vulnerable adults; or

(f) The department of children, youth, and families for the purpose of meeting responsibilities in chapters 43.216 and 74.15 RCW. However, access to conviction records pursuant to this subsection (1)(f) does not limit or restrict the ability of [the] department of children, youth, and families to obtain additional information regarding conviction records and pending charges as provided in RCW 74.15.030(2)(b).

(2) The state patrol shall by rule establish fees for disseminating records under this section to recipients identified in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section. The state patrol shall also by rule establish fees for disseminating records in the custody of the national crime information center. The revenue from the fees shall cover, as nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs to the state patrol of disseminating the records. No fee shall be charged to a nonprofit organization for the records check. Record checks requested by school districts and educational service districts using only name and date of birth will be provided free of charge.

(3) No employee of the state, employee of a business or organization, or the business or organization is liable for defamation, invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with any lawful dissemination of information under RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.840 or 43.43.760.

(4) Before July 26, 1987, the state patrol shall adopt rules and forms to implement this section and to provide for security and privacy of information disseminated under this section, giving first priority to the criminal justice requirements of this chapter. The rules may include requirements for users, audits of users, and other procedures to prevent use of civil adjudication record information or criminal history record information inconsistent with this chapter.

(5) Nothing in RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.840 shall authorize an employer to make an inquiry not specifically authorized by this chapter, or be construed to affect the policy of the state declared in chapter 9.96A RCW.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 226; 2009 c 170 s 1; 2007 c 17 s 5; 2005 c 421 s 5; 1995 c 29 s 1; 1992 c 159 s 7; 1990 c 3 s 1104. Prior: 1989 c 334 s 4; 1989 c 90 s 4; 1987 c 486 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Findings—1992 c 159: See note following RCW 28A.400.303.